Utah statutes.
76-4-204.   Criminal solicitation -- Penalties.

(1)  Criminal solicitation to commit:

(a)  a capital felony, or a felony punishable by imprisonment for life without parole, is a first degree felony;

(b)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(c) or (d), a first degree felony is a second degree felony;

(c)  any of the following offenses is a first degree felony punishable by imprisonment for an indeterminate term of not fewer than three years and which may be for life:

(i)  murder, Subsection 76-5-203(2)(a);

(ii)  child kidnapping, Section 76-5-301.1; or

(iii)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(d), any of the felonies described in Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4, Sexual Offenses, that are first degree felonies;

(d)  except as provided in Subsection (2), any of the following offenses is a first degree felony, punishable by a term of imprisonment of not less than 15 years and which may be for life:

(i)  rape of a child, Section 76-5-402.1;

(ii)  object rape of a child, Section 76-5-402.3; or

(iii)  sodomy on a child, Section 76-5-403.1;

(e)  a second degree felony is a third degree felony; and

(f)  a third degree felony is a class A misdemeanor.

(2)  If, when imposing a sentence under Subsection (1)(d), a court finds that a lesser term than the term described in Subsection (1)(d) is in the interests of justice and states the reasons for this finding on the record, the court may impose a term of imprisonment of not less than:

(a)  10 years and which may be for life;

(b)  six years and which may be for life; or

(c)  three years and which may be for life.

